Hawaii statutes.
[§346-374.5] Emergency shelter;
minimum requirements. [Section effective July 1, 2017.] (a) This
section shall apply to every emergency shelter operated by a provider agency
that is under contract with the department to receive homeless shelter stipends
for providing shelter and services to homeless families or individuals at the
emergency shelter.

(b) The department shall require an emergency
shelter to comply with the following:

(1) The shelter shall have the number of showers and
bathrooms that the department deems appropriate and sufficient for the number
of homeless families or individuals that use the shelter and the capacity of
the shelter. The showers and bathrooms may be part of the shelter building or
portable and unattached to the shelter building;

(2) The shelter shall have partitioned space for each
homeless family or individual that provides separation from other homeless
families or individuals in the shelter. The minimum area of the partitioned
space and height of the partition shall be determined by the department and may
differ among transitional shelters, according to the number of homeless
families or individuals that use the shelter and the capacity of the shelter.
A shelter that provides separate rooms or portable dwelling units for homeless
families or individuals, including converted shipping containers or school
classrooms, shall be deemed to exceed this minimum requirement; and

(3) The shelter shall provide storage for the
personal possessions of each homeless family or individual served by the
shelter. The storage shall be securable by the homeless family or individual.
The type and number of the storage equipment, space, or area shall be
determined by the department.

(c) The department may require an emergency
shelter to comply with any other requirements that the department deems
appropriate or necessary. The requirements established by the department may
vary among emergency shelters.

(d) A provider agency contracted to operate or
manage an emergency shelter not owned by the department shall comply with the
minimum requirements of subsection (b). The provider agency shall bear all
costs of compliance, unless the department provides or contributes state
funding assistance; provided that the state funding assistance shall be:

(1) In addition to homeless shelter stipends paid to
the provider agency under section 346-374;

(2) Subject to the availability of legislative
appropriations; and

(3) Recoverable, in whole or part, by the department
if the provider agency does not perform satisfactorily under or for the
duration of the term of its contract with the department to operate or manage
the shelter.

(e) Any emergency shelter owned by the
department shall comply with the minimum requirements under subsection (b), regardless
of whether the department contracts with a provider agency to manage or operate
the emergency shelter. [L 2016, c 234, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next